Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
ARTICLE 16
PROGRAM OF ALL-INCLUSIVE CARE FOR THE ELDERLY

26-16-101 to 26-16-109. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 91:

Entire article repealed, p. 1859, § 23, effective April 11.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1990 and was not amended prior to its repeal in 1991. For the text of this article prior to 1991, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Cross references:

For current provisions concerning a program of all-inclusive care for the elderly, see § 25.5-5-412.